ru: Регулировка длины: Регулируемый; Фиксированный; Другой
hu: Hosszállíthatóság: Állítható; Rögzített; Egyéb
lt-LT: Ilgio reguliavimas: Reguliuojamas; Fiksuotas; Kita
sk-SK: Nastaviteľnosť dĺžky: Nastaviteľný; Pevný; Iné
pl: Regulacja długości: Regulowane; Stałe; Inne
th: การปรับความยาว: แบบปรับได้; แบบแช่น้ำยารักษาสภาพ; อื่นๆ
cs: Nastavitelnost délky: Nastavitelný; Pevný; Jiné
de: Längenverstellbarkeit: Einstellbar; Befestigt; Sonstiges
nb: Lengdejusterbarhet: Regulerbar; Fast; Annet
ja: 長さ調整可能性: 調整可能; 固定; その他
hr-HR: Prilagodljivost duljine: Podesivo; Fiksno; Ostalo
sl-SI: Prilagodljivost dolžine: Prilagodljiva; Fiksen; Drugo
ro-RO: Ajustabilitatea lungimii: Ajustabil; Fix; Altele
vi: Khả năng điều chỉnh độ dài: Có thể điều chỉnh; Cố định; Khác
ko: 길이 조정 가능성: 조절식; 고정; 기타
es: Ajustabilidad de longitud: Ajustable; Fijo; Otros
da: Længdejusterbarhed: Justerbar; Fast; Andet
it: Regolabilità della lunghezza: Regolabile; Fisso; Altro
sv: Längdjustering: Justerbar; Fast; Övrigt
zh-TW: 長度可調整性: 可調節式; 固定; 其他
fr: Ajustabilité de la longueur: Ajustables; Fixé; Autre
tr: Uzunluk ayarlanabilirliği: Ayarlanabilir; Sabit; Diğer
zh-CN: 长度可调性: 可调节; 固定; 其他
fi: Pituuden säädettävyys: Säädettävä; Pysyvä; Muu
bg-BG: Регулируемост на дължината: Регулируемо; Фиксирани; Други
el: Ρυθμιζόμενο μήκος: Ρυθμιζόμενο; Σταθερή; Άλλο
nl: Lengte verstelbaarheid: Verstelbaar; Vast; Andere
en: Length adjustability: Adjustable; Fixed; Other
pt-BR: Ajustabilidade do comprimento: Ajustável; Fixo; Outro
pt-PT: Ajustabilidade do comprimento: Ajustável; Fixo; Outro